nounPred.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<Cpl%:Aor%>
%{SPC%}

LEXICON pred

%<Cpl%:Aor%>:%-d%{I%}r C4;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-%(y%)m%{I%}ş C6;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-%{SPC%}%{I%}d%{I%} C8;
%<Cpl%:Aor%>:%- C9;

LEXICON C8

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-m P3;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-n P3;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P3;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%{Q%} P3;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-n%{I%}z P3;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P3;

LEXICON C9

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}m P3;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{A%}n P3;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}%{Q%} P3;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P3;
